Florida, session 2026, SB1260.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âParagraph (n) of subsection (2) of section 16 252.35, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 17 252.35âEmergency management powers; Division of Emergency 18 Management.â 19 (2)âThe division is responsible for carrying out the 20 provisions of ss. 252.31-252.90. In performing its duties, the 21 division shall: 22 (n)âImplement training programs to maintain this stateâs 23 status as a national leader in emergency management and improve 24 the ability of state and local emergency management personnel to 25 prepare and implement emergency management plans and programs. 26 This must include a continuous training program for agencies and 27 individuals who will be called on to perform key roles in state 28 and local postdisaster response and recovery efforts and for 29 local government personnel on federal and state postdisaster 30 response and recovery strategies and procedures. The division 31 shall specify requirements for the minimum number of training 32 hours that county or municipal administrators, county or city 33 managers, county or municipal emergency management directors, 34 and county or municipal public works directors or other 35 officials responsible for the construction and maintenance of 36 public infrastructure must complete biennially in addition to 37 the training required pursuant to s. 252.38(1)(b). Such training 38 may be provided by the division or, for county personnel, by a 39 foundation that is a not-for-profit corporation under s. 40 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and has a governing board 41 that includes in its membership county commissioners and 42 professional county staff. If training is provided by a 43 foundation, including the training program required under s. 44 468.634(2), such training must be approved by the division. 45 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 46 252.381, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 47 252.381âInformation related to natural emergencies; 48 poststorm county and municipal permitting; operations.â 49 (2)(a)âEach county and municipality shall develop a 50 poststorm permitting plan to expedite recovery and rebuilding by 51 providing for special building permit and inspection procedures 52 after a hurricane or tropical storm. The plan must, at a 53 minimum: 54 1.âEnsure sufficient personnel are prepared and available 55 to expeditiously manage postdisaster building inspection, 56 permitting, and enforcement tasks. The plan must anticipate 57 conditions that would necessitate supplemental personnel for 58 such tasks and address methods for fulfilling such personnel 59 needs, including through mutual aid agreements as authorized in 60 s. 252.40; other arrangements, such as those with private sector 61 contractors; or supplemental state or federal funding. The plan 62 must include training requirements and protocols for 63 supplemental personnel to ensure compliance with local 64 floodplain management requirements that apply within the county 65 or municipality, including the training program required under 66 s. 468.634(3), if applicable. 67 2.âAccount for multiple or alternate locations where 68 building permit services may be offered in person to the public 69 following a hurricane or tropical storm during regular business 70 hours. 71 3.âSpecify a protocol to expedite permitting procedures 72 and, if practicable, for the waiver or reduction of applicable 73 fees in accordance with and in addition to the procedures and 74 waivers provided for under s. 553.7922. The plan must identify 75 the types of permits that are frequently requested following a 76 hurricane or tropical storm and methods to expedite the 77 processing of such permits. 78 4.âSpecify procedures and resources necessary to promote 79 expeditious debris removal following a hurricane or tropical 80 storm. 81 Section 3.âSection 468.634, Florida Statutes, is created to 82 read: 83 468.634âEmergency provisions.â 84 (1)âNotwithstanding any other law, the Governor may allow a 85 person to act in any of the following positions if such person 86 is qualified for such work in a state that has a mutual aid 87 agreement entered into pursuant to s. 252.40(2) and such person 88 has taken the training program described in subsection (2) and, 89 if applicable, subsection (3): 90 (a)âBuilding code inspector. 91 (b)âBuilding inspector. 92 (c)âCoastal construction inspector. 93 (d)âCommercial electrical inspector. 94 (e)âElectrical inspector. 95 (f)âMechanical inspector. 96 (g)âPlumbing inspector. 97 (h)âResidential electrical inspector. 98 (i)âResidential inspector. 99 (j)âPlans examiner. 100 (k)âBuilding plans examiner. 101 (l)âPlumbing plans examiner. 102 (m)âMechanical plans examiner. 103 (n)âElectrical plans examiner. 104 (2)âThe Division of Emergency Management and the Department 105 of Business and Professional Regulation shall develop a Florida 106 Building Code training program. 107 (3)âA local government with a local amendment to the 108 Florida Building Code shall develop a training program on all 109 local amendments applicable within the jurisdiction of such 110 government. 111 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.